SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.aff
SFX B ĕ шĕрĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ӳн/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 рĕн/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йӳн/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕрĕн/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕн/RT [^еĕиӳт]
SFX B т чĕн/RT т
SFX B 0 ĕсем/P [^еĕиӳт]
SFX B т чĕсем/P т
SFX B е ин/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕн/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ син/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шин/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ин/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕн/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕме/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕмĕре/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ме/RT е
SFX B 0 мĕре/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕме/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмĕре/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕме/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B 0 ме/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 мĕре/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕме/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕмĕре/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳне/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕре/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е ӳне/RT е
SFX B е ĕре/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвне/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕре/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шӳне/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ӳне/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 ре/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йӳне/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕре/RT и
SFX B 0 не/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е ине/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвне/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шине/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ине/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕне/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕмре/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕмĕрте/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 мре/RT е
SFX B 0 мĕрте/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмре/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмĕрте/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмре/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B 0 мре/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 мĕрте/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕмре/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕмĕрте/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳнче/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕрте/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е ӳнче/RT е
SFX B е ĕрте/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвӳнче/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕрте/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шӳнче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕрте/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ӳнче/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 рте/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йӳнче/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕрте/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕнче/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е инче/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕнче/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ винче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кинче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ линче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ минче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нинче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пинче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ ринче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ синче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çинче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тинче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хинче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чинче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шинче/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ инче/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕнче/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕнчи/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е инчи/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕнчи/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ винчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кинчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ линчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ минчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нинчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пинчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ ринчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ синчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çинчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тинчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хинчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чинчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шинчи/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ инчи/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕнчи/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕмрен/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕмĕртен/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 мрен/RT е
SFX B 0 мĕртен/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмрен/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмĕртен/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмрен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B 0 мрен/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 мĕртен/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕмрен/RT и
