SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.dic
çĕçĕ/B
çĕр/GB
çивĕт/B
çухатни/B
ĕç/GB
ĕçлев/B
ĕлĕш/B
ĕмĕтленӳ/B
ĕнĕл/B
ĕненӳлĕх/B
ĕнтĕрки/B
ĕрескет/B
ĕрчевлĕх/B
ĕшкев/B
Авель/B
Аксĕвер/B
Алтти/B
Англи/B
Армени/B
Ахмантей/B
Белорусси/B
Бретань/B
Ваçтирек/B
Вастирек/B
Вестфали/B
Германи/B
Дементий/B
Еврази/B
Елентей/B
Енешпи/B
Еншей/B
Ехемпер/B
Закавказье/B
Иçли/B
Илетер/B
Илпек/B
Илтик/B
Имелххен/B
Иревли/B
Исланди/B
Ителмес/B
Йĕппи/B
Кĕмĕлле/B
Кĕртиш/B
Калифорни/B
Кармантей/B
Кахвисе/B
Киргизи/B
Константинополь/B
Леве/B
Любовь/B
Мĕслĕм/B
Малеç/B
Мариуполь/B
Матийер/B
Мелитополь/B
Мерхепе/B
Миккон/B
Минлеккей/B
Михей/B
Молдави/B
Мулиç/B
Неаполь/B
Нягань/B
Паçей/B
Пайхерей/B
Патйер/B
Перси/B
Пиккĕне/B
Пинеç/B
Пинеслĕ/B
Пипӳ/B
Питтимĕр/B
Понтий/B
Приднепровье/B
Пунтĕри/B
Ристем/B
Сĕверкке/B
Сĕрпике/B
Савелий/B
Савкачей/B
Савни/B
Саите/B
Санихер/B
Сарманти/B
Сахвантер/B
Сверти/B
Сенекил/B
Сентилет/B
Сервери/B
Серпине/B
Сетрепи/B
Силерпи/B
Силпик/B
Сименки/B
Синерпи/B
Ситехмет/B
Словаки/B
Суркки/B
Тăхтимон/B
Талматти/B
Теверпи/B
Тевтилет/B
Тетилет/B
Тиментей/B
Тоскилтĕ/B
Туйментей/B
Тумантей/B
Тутимĕр/B
Удмурти/B
Улихер/B
Унеспи/B
Утимĕр/B
Ухвантей/B
Финлянди/B
Хĕр/B
Хĕртилет/B
Хамите/B
Хертик/B
Хуньтирек/B
Шĕвĕртек/B
Шелепи/B
Шеремет/B
Шерпенес/B
Шехрине/B
Элен/B
Элмен/B
Эмине/B
Эптĕк/B
Эрнеç/B
Эссен/B
Эхмет/B
Япони/B
авăнçи/B
австри/B
автостанци/B
агромелиораци/B
акватори/B
алиби/B
алюмини/B
амфиби/B
анне/B
антологи/B
априори/B
аристократи/B
асанне/B
ассенизаци/B
атвитсĕр/B
аффиксаци/B
бандероль/B
биологи/B
брюки/B
вăрманти/B
вĕçкĕнлĕх/B
вĕçтеркĕч/B
вĕренекен/B
вĕркĕшӳ/B
вĕтĕлĕх/B
вĕтлем/B
вĕчев/B
ваниль/B
вентиль/B
вертикаль/B
виççĕлĕх/B
вигонь/B
вилеслĕх/B
вирусологи/B
витĕнкĕç/B
витти/B
восстани/B
выключатель/B
гальванизаци/B
гели/B
гербари/B
гильди/B
гомеопати/B
громкоговоритель/B
дедукци/B
декламаци/B
демаркаци/B
депресси/B
джунгли/B
дирекци/B
диссертаци/B
довольстви/B
драматурги/B
евĕрлев/B
екки/B
ентеш/B
ермек/B
ешĕк/B
женьшень/B
заместитель/B
зоогеографи/B
ие/B
изобретатель/B
иккĕленӳ/B
илем/B
иллюзи/B
именӳ/B
инçĕш/B
индексаци/B
инке/B
интервенци/B
инфекци/B
иптĕк/FB
ирĕм/B
иртни/B
истребитель/B
июнь/B
йĕк/B
йĕкел/B
йĕлме/B
йĕнерçĕ/B
йĕр/BV
йĕркеçĕ/B
йĕсме/B
йывăрăшсăрлăх/B
йӳн/B
йӳрĕклĕх/B
кăчăрми/B
кĕçнерникун/B
кĕвсе/B
кĕлевĕç/B
кĕлмĕçлĕх/B
кĕнеке/B
кĕпĕрленчĕк/B
кĕрĕ/B
кĕрекеçĕ/B
кĕретлĕх/B
кĕрленкĕ/B
кĕрпек/B
кĕскĕ/B
кĕсье/B
кĕтлĕх/B
кĕшĕл/B
кавир/B
какриш/B
каллиграфи/B
кальцинаци/B
канализаци/B
кантти/B
каратель/B
картишçĕ/B
катанпир/B
кегель/B
киçмĕк/B
килĕнтеш/B
килĕшӳлĕх/B
килӳ/B
кинодраматурги/B
кипĕт/B
кирлĕлĕх/B
кисренӳ/B
кишмиш/B
климатологи/B
колготки/B
кольраби/B
коммуникаци/B
композици/B
консерватори/B
консультаци/B
конференци/B
коньки/B
корреспонденци/B
краеведени/B
кристаллизаци/B
куçкĕски/B
куманне/B
кусиле/B
кюре/B
кӳлленчĕк/B
кӳпчек/B
кӳштек/B
лĕкĕ/B
лĕпĕш/B
лапăсти/B
левĕр/B
лексикологи/B
лесничи/B
литпĕрлешӳ/B
лосось/B
мăкăнь/B
мăчăлти/B
мĕскĕнлĕх/B
маги/B
манет/B
матрӳшке/B
медаль/B
мелиораци/B
мемме/B
меслет/B
методологи/B
мешӳрет/B
микрофотографи/B
мимесĕр/B
мирлешӳ/B
мобилизаци/B
музыковедени/B
нĕрсĕрлĕх/B
начарри/B
никĕслевçĕ/B
нӳхреп/B
омоними/B
отношени/B
пĕкĕ/B
пĕлӳçĕ/B
пĕрлĕхлĕх/B
пĕрьенлĕх/B
пĕчченлĕх/B
парнелĕх/B
пеккет/B
перфораци/B
пиевçĕ/B
пилсĕрлĕх/B
питсĕр/B
полиграфи/B
пособи/B
прери/B
пропорци/B
пулăшни/B
пурăнаканскер/B
пӳкĕм/B
пӳртĕш/B
радиостанци/B
реанимаци/B
резолюци/B
репетици/B
розари/B
сĕмсĕрлĕх/B
сĕткен/B
санэпидстанци/B
сенĕк/B
сехĕрленӳ/B
сиккеленчĕк/B
симметрисĕрлĕх/B
сирпĕтӳ/B
совеçсĕр/B
спецификаци/B
стиллĕх/B
супинкке/B
сӳлеме/B
сӳсмен/B
тĕкĕчĕ/B
тĕмен/B
тĕпкĕч/B
тĕрĕссĕр/B
тĕрленчĕк/B
тĕш/B
тевет/B
тенешкел/B
тете/B
тикĕслĕх/B
типизаци/B
тиреклĕх/B
травматологи/B
трусси/B
тӳлеклĕх/B
тӳремлĕх/B
удобрени/B
уравнени/B
фальсификаци/B
филе/B
фотолаборатори/B
хĕвĕшӳ/B
хĕрĕп/B
хĕсĕклĕх/B
хатĕрлĕх/B
хирĕçлев/B
хронологи/B
хӳтĕсĕр/B
чăнкăрти/B
чĕлĕх/B
чĕнтĕр/B
чĕркеленчĕк/B
чарăлти/B
черетлĕх/B
чикĕ/B
читлĕх/B
шăнкăрти/B
шакăлти/B
шерĕх/B
шикленӳ/B
шывсикки/B
экономи/B
электризаци/B
элччĕ/B
эпи/B
эрне/B
эткерлĕх/B
Ӳмер/B
ӳпĕнчĕк/B
ӳрче/B
